Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2111
Functional classification; assignment; appeal.

The county or municipality may appeal to the Board of Public Roads Classifications and Standards from any action taken by the Department of Transportation in assigning any functional classification under section 39-2110. Upon the taking of such an appeal, the board shall review all information pertaining to the assignment, hold a hearing thereon if deemed advisable, and render a decision on the assigned classification. The decision of the board may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1969, c. 312, § 11, p. 1123;

Laws 1971, LB 100, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 32;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 150.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.